California statutes. Probate Code
(e) The time for transfer to the minor of custodial property transferred by irrevocable gift under Section 3904 may be delayed under this section only if the transfer pursuant to Section 3909 provides in substance that the custodianship is to continue until the time the minor attains a specified age, which time may not be later than the time the minor attains 21 years of age.

(f) The time for transfer to the minor of custodial property transferred by a trustee under Section 3906 may be delayed under this section only if the transfer pursuant to Section 3909 provides that the custodianship is to continue until a specified time not later than the time the minor attains 25 years of age or the time of termination of all present beneficial interests of the minor in the trust from
 which the custodial property was transferred, whichever is to occur first.

(g) If the transfer pursuant to Section 3909 does not specify any age, the time for the transfer of the custodial property to the minor under Section 3920 is the time when the minor attains 18 years of age.

(h) If the transfer pursuant to Section 3909 provides in substance that the duration of the custodianship is for a time longer than the maximum time permitted by this section for the duration of a custodianship created by that type of transfer, the custodianship shall be deemed to continue only until the time the minor attains the maximum age permitted by this section for the duration of a custodianship created by that type of transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

3921.

Subject to the power of the court to transfer actions and proceedings as provided in the Code of Civil Procedure, a petition filed under this part shall be heard and proceedings thereon held in the superior court in the proper county, which shall be determined as follows:

(a) If the minor resides in this state, in either of the following counties:

(1) Where the minor resides.

(2) Where the custodian resides.

(b) If the minor does not reside within this state, in any of the following counties:

(1) Where the transferor resides.

(2) Where the custodian resides.

(3) Where the estate of a deceased or legally incapacitated custodian is being administered.

(4) Where a parent of the minor resides.

(c) If neither the minor, nor the transferor, nor any parent resides within this state, and no estate of a deceased or legally incapacitated custodian is being administered within this state, in any county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3922.

This part applies to a transfer within the scope of Section 3902 made on or after January 1, 1985, if either of the following requirements is satisfied:

(a) The transfer purports to have been made under the California Uniform Gifts to Minors Act.

(b) The instrument by which the transfer purports to have been made uses in substance the designation “as custodian under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act” or “as custodian under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act” of any other state, and the application of this part is necessary to
 validate the transfer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3923.

(a) As used in this section, “California Uniform Gifts to Minors Act” means former Article 4 (commencing with Section 1154) of Chapter 3 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code.

(b) Any transfer of custodial property, as now defined in this part, made before January 1, 1985, is validated, notwithstanding that there was no specific authority in the California Uniform Gifts to Minors Act for the coverage of custodial property of that kind or for a transfer from that source at the time the transfer was made.

(c) This part applies to all transfers made before January 1, 1985, in a manner and form prescribed in the California Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, except insofar as the application impairs constitutionally vested rights.

(d) To the extent that this part, by virtue of subdivision (c), does not apply to transfers made in a manner prescribed in the California Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or to the powers, duties, and immunities conferred by transfers in that manner upon custodians and persons dealing with custodians, the repeal of the California Uniform Gifts to Minors Act does not affect those transfers or those powers, duties, and immunities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3925.

This part shall not be construed as providing an exclusive method for making gifts or other transfers to minors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4.5. POWERS OF ATTORNEY [4000. - 4545.]



PART 1. DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS [4000. - 4054.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title and Definitions [4000. - 4034.]

4000.

This division may be cited as the Power of Attorney Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.

Sections 4124, 4125, 4126, 4127, 4206, 4304, and 4305 may be cited as the Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4010.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4014.

(a) “Attorney-in-fact” means a person granted authority to act for the principal in a power of attorney, regardless of whether the person is known as an attorney-in-fact or agent, or by some other term.

(b) “Attorney-in-fact” includes a successor or alternate attorney-in-fact and a person delegated authority by an attorney-in-fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4018.

“Durable power of attorney” means a power of attorney that satisfies the requirements for durability provided in Section 4124.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4022.

“Power of attorney” means a written instrument, however denominated, that is executed by a natural person having the capacity to contract and that grants authority to an attorney-in-fact. A power of attorney may be durable or nondurable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4026.

“Principal” means a natural person who executes a power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4030.

“Springing power of attorney” means a power of attorney that by its terms becomes effective at a specified future time or on the occurrence of a specified future event or contingency, including, but not limited to, the subsequent incapacity of the principal. A springing power of attorney may be a durable power of attorney or a nondurable power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4034.

“Third person” means any person other than the principal or attorney-in-fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [4050. - 4054.]

4050.

(a) This division applies to the following:

(1) Durable powers of attorney, other than powers of attorney for health care governed by Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4600).

(2) Statutory form powers of attorney under Part 3 (commencing with Section 4400).

(3) Any other power of attorney that incorporates or refers to this division or the provisions of this division.

(b) This division does not apply to the following:

(1) A power of attorney to the extent that the authority of the attorney-in-fact is coupled with an interest in the subject of the power of attorney.

(2) Reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges and their contracts, subscribers, attorneys-in-fact, agents, and representatives.

(3) A proxy given by an attorney-in-fact to another person to exercise voting rights.

(c) This division is not intended to affect the validity of any instrument or arrangement that is not described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4051.

Except where this division provides a specific rule, the general law of agency, including Article 2 (commencing with Section 2019) of Chapter 2 of Title 6 of, and Title 9 (commencing with Section 2295) of, Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, applies to powers of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.

(a) If a power of attorney provides that the Power of Attorney Law of this state governs the power of attorney or otherwise indicates the principal’s intention that the Power of Attorney Law of this state governs the power of attorney, this division governs the power of attorney and applies to acts and transactions of the attorney-in-fact in this state or outside this state where any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The principal or attorney-in-fact was domiciled in this state when the principal executed the power of attorney.

(2) The authority conferred on the attorney-in-fact relates to property, acts, or transactions in this state.

(3) The acts or transactions of the attorney-in-fact occurred or were intended to occur in this state.

(4) The principal executed the power of attorney in this state.

(5) There is otherwise a reasonable relationship between this state and the subject matter of the power of attorney.

(b) If subdivision (a) does not apply to the power of attorney, this division governs the power of attorney and applies to the acts and transactions of the attorney-in-fact in this state where either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The principal was domiciled in this state when the principal executed the power of attorney.

(2) The principal executed the power of attorney in this state.

(c) A power of attorney described in this section remains subject to this division despite a change in domicile of the principal or the attorney-in-fact, or the removal from this state of property that was the subject of the power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4053.

A durable power of attorney executed in another state or jurisdiction in compliance with the law of that state or jurisdiction or the law of this state is valid and enforceable in this state to the same extent as a durable power of attorney executed in this state, regardless of whether the principal is a domiciliary of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4054.

Except as otherwise provided by statute:

(a) On and after January 1, 1995, this division applies to all powers of attorney regardless of whether they were executed before, on, or after January 1, 1995.

(b) This division applies to all proceedings concerning powers of attorney commenced on or after January 1, 1995.

(c) This division applies to all proceedings concerning powers of attorney commenced before January 1, 1995, unless the court determines that application of a particular provision of this division would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the proceedings or the rights of the parties and other interested persons, in which case the particular provision of this division does not apply and prior law applies.

(d) Nothing in this division affects the validity of a power of attorney executed before January 1, 1995, that was valid under prior law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 300, Sec. 3.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. POWERS OF ATTORNEY GENERALLY [4100. - 4310.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [4100. - 4102.]

4100.

This part applies to all powers of attorney under this division, subject to any special rules applicable to statutory form powers of attorney under Part 3 (commencing with Section 4400).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4101.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the principal may limit the application of any provision of this division by an express statement in the power of attorney or by providing an inconsistent rule in the power of attorney.

(b) A power of attorney may not limit either the application of a statute specifically providing that it is not subject to limitation in the power of attorney or a statute concerning any of the following:

(1) Warnings or notices required to be included in a power of attorney.

(2) Operative dates of statutory enactments or amendments.

(3) Execution formalities.

(4) Qualifications of witnesses.

(5) Qualifications of attorneys-in-fact.

(6) Protection of third persons from liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4102.

Notwithstanding Section 4128:

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), on and after January 1, 1995, a printed form of a durable power of attorney may be sold or otherwise distributed if it satisfies the requirements of former Section 2510.5 of the Civil Code.

(b) A printed form of a durable power of attorney printed on or after January 1, 1986, that is sold or otherwise distributed in this state for use by a person who does not have the advice of legal counsel shall comply with former Section 2510 of the Civil Code or with Section 4128 of this code.

(c) A durable power of attorney executed on or after January 1, 1995, using a printed form that complies with subdivision (b) of former Section 2400 of the Civil Code, as enacted by Chapter 511 of the Statutes of 1981, or with former Section 2510 of the Civil Code, is as valid as if it had been executed using a printed form that complies with Section 4128 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Creation and Effect of Powers of Attorney [4120. - 4130.]

4120.

A natural person having the capacity to contract may execute a power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4121.

A power of attorney is legally sufficient if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The power of attorney contains the date of its execution.

(b) The power of attorney is signed either (1) by the principal or (2) in the principal’s name by another adult in the principal’s presence and at the principal’s direction.

(c) The power of
 attorney is either (1) acknowledged before a notary public or (2) signed by at least two witnesses who satisfy the requirements of Section 4122.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4122.

If the power of attorney is signed by witnesses, as provided in Section 4121, the following requirements shall be satisfied:

(a) The witnesses shall be adults.

(b) The attorney-in-fact may not act as a witness.

(c) Each witness signing the power of attorney shall witness either the signing of the instrument by the principal or the principal’s
 acknowledgment of the signature or the power of attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4123.

(a) In a power of attorney under this division, a principal may grant authority to an attorney-in-fact to act on the principal’s behalf with respect to all lawful subjects and purposes or with respect to one or more express subjects or purposes. The attorney-in-fact may be granted authority with regard to the principal’s property, personal care, or any other matter.

(b) With regard to property matters, a power of attorney may grant authority to make decisions concerning all or
 part of the principal’s real and personal property, whether owned by the principal at the time of the execution of the power of attorney or thereafter acquired or whether located in this state or elsewhere, without the need for a description of each item or parcel of property.

(c) With regard to personal care, a power of attorney may grant authority to make decisions relating to the personal care of the principal, including, but not limited to, determining where the principal will live, providing meals, hiring household employees, providing transportation, handling mail, and arranging recreation and entertainment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 230, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4124.

A durable power of attorney is a power of attorney by which a principal designates another person as attorney-in-fact in writing and the power of attorney contains any of the following statements:

(a) “This power of attorney shall not be affected by subsequent incapacity of the principal.”

(b) “This power of attorney shall become effective upon the incapacity of the principal.”

(c) Similar words showing the intent of the principal that the authority conferred shall be exercisable notwithstanding the principal’s subsequent incapacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4125.

All acts done by an attorney-in-fact pursuant to a durable power of attorney during any period of incapacity of the principal have the same effect and inure to the benefit of and bind the principal and the principal’s successors in interest as if the principal had capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4126.

(a) A principal may nominate, by a durable power of attorney, a conservator of the person or estate or both, or a guardian of the person or estate or both, for consideration by the court if protective proceedings for the principal’s person or estate are thereafter commenced.

(b) If the protective proceedings are conservatorship proceedings in this state, the nomination has the effect provided in Section 1810 and the court shall give effect to the most recent writing executed in
 accordance with Section 1810, whether or not the writing is a durable power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4127.

Unless a power of attorney states a time of termination, the authority of the attorney-in-fact is exercisable notwithstanding any lapse of time since execution of the power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4128.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a printed form of a durable power of attorney that is sold or otherwise distributed in this state for use by a person who does not have the advice of legal counsel shall contain, in not less than 10-point boldface type or a reasonable equivalent thereof, the following warning statements:Notice to Person Executing Durable Power of Attorney

A durable power of attorney is an important legal document. By signing the durable power of attorney, you are
 authorizing another person to act for you, the principal. Before you sign this durable power of attorney, you should know these important facts:

Your agent (attorney-in-fact) has no duty to act unless you and your agent agree otherwise in writing.

This document gives your agent the powers to manage, dispose of, sell, and convey your real and personal property, and to use your property as security if your agent borrows money on your behalf. This document does not give your agent the power to accept or receive any of your property, in trust or otherwise, as a gift, unless you specifically authorize the agent to accept or receive a gift.

Your agent will have the right to receive reasonable payment for services provided under this durable power of attorney unless you provide otherwise in this power of attorney. 

The powers you give your agent
 will continue to exist for your entire lifetime, unless you state that the durable power of attorney will last for a shorter period of time or unless you otherwise terminate the durable power of attorney. The powers you give your agent in this durable power of attorney will continue to exist even if you can no longer make your own decisions respecting the management of your property.

You can amend or change this durable power of attorney only by executing a new durable power of attorney or by executing an amendment through the same formalities as an original. You have the right to revoke or terminate this durable power of attorney at any time, so long as you are competent.

This durable power of attorney must be dated and must be acknowledged before a notary public or signed by two witnesses. If it is signed by two witnesses, they must witness either (1) the signing of the power of attorney or (2) the principal’s signing or
 acknowledgment of his or her signature. A durable power of attorney that may affect real property should be acknowledged before a notary public so that it may easily be recorded.

You should read this durable power of attorney carefully. When effective, this durable power of attorney will give your agent the right to deal with property that you now have or might acquire in the future. The durable power of attorney is important to you. If you do not understand the durable power of attorney, or any provision of it, then you should obtain the assistance of an attorney or other qualified person.

Notice to Person Accepting the Appointment as Attorney-in-Fact

By acting or agreeing to act as the agent (attorney-in-fact) under this power of attorney you assume the fiduciary and other legal responsibilities of an agent. These responsibilities include:

1. The legal duty to act solely in the interest of the principal and to avoid conflicts of interest.

2. The legal duty to keep the principal’s property separate and distinct from any other property owned or controlled by you.

You may not transfer the principal’s property to yourself without full and adequate consideration or accept a gift of the principal’s property unless this power of attorney specifically authorizes you to transfer property to yourself or accept a gift of the principal’s property. If you transfer the principal’s property to yourself without specific authorization in the power of attorney, you may be prosecuted for fraud and/or embezzlement. If the principal is 65 years of age or older at the time that the property is transferred to you without authority, you may also be prosecuted for elder abuse under Penal Code Section
 368. In addition to criminal prosecution, you may also be sued in civil court.

I have read the foregoing notice and I understand the legal and fiduciary duties that I assume by acting or agreeing to act as the agent (attorney-in-fact) under the terms of this power of attorney.Date:
(Signature of agent)
(Print name of agent)(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) invalidates any transaction in which a third person relied in good faith on the authority created by the durable power of attorney.

(c) This section does not apply to a statutory form power of attorney under Part 3 (commencing with
 Section 4400).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 999, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4129.

(a) In a springing power of attorney, the principal may designate one or more persons who, by a written declaration under penalty of perjury, have the power to determine conclusively that the specified event or contingency has occurred. The principal may designate the attorney-in-fact or another person to perform this function, either alone or jointly with other persons.

(b) A springing power of attorney containing the designation described in subdivision (a) becomes effective when
 the person or persons designated in the power of attorney execute a written declaration under penalty of perjury that the specified event or contingency has occurred, and any person may act in reliance on the written declaration without liability to the principal or to any other person, regardless of whether the specified event or contingency has actually occurred.

(c) This section applies to a power of attorney whether executed before, on, or after January 1, 1991, if the power of attorney contains the designation described in subdivision (a).

(d) This section does not provide the exclusive method by which a power of attorney may be limited to take effect on the occurrence of a specified event or contingency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4130.

(a) If a principal grants inconsistent authority to one or more attorneys-in-fact in two or more powers of attorney, the authority granted last controls to the extent of the inconsistency.

(b) This section is not subject to limitation in the power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Modification and Revocation of Powers of Attorney [4150. - 4155.]

4150.

(a) A principal may modify a power of attorney as follows:

(1) In accordance with the terms of the power of attorney.

(2) By an instrument executed in the same manner as a power of attorney may be executed.

(b) An attorney-in-fact or third person who does not have notice of the modification is protected from liability as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 300, Sec. 4.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4151.

(a) A principal may revoke a power of attorney as follows:

(1) In accordance with the terms of the power of attorney.

(2) By a writing. This paragraph is not subject to limitation in the power of attorney.

(b) An attorney-in-fact or third person who does not have notice of the revocation is protected from liability as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 300, Sec. 5.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4152.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the authority of an attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney is terminated by any of the following events:

(1) In accordance with the terms of the power of attorney.

(2) Extinction of the subject or fulfillment of the purpose of the power of attorney.

(3) Revocation of the attorney-in-fact’s authority, as provided in Section 4153.

(4) Death of the principal, except as to specific authority permitted by statute to be exercised after the principal’s death.

(5) Removal of the attorney-in-fact.

(6) Resignation of the attorney-in-fact.

(7) Incapacity of the attorney-in-fact, except that a temporary incapacity suspends the attorney-in-fact’s authority only during the period of the incapacity.

(8) Dissolution or annulment of the marriage of the attorney-in-fact and principal, as provided in Section 4154.

(9) Death of the attorney-in-fact.

(b) An attorney-in-fact or third person who does not have notice of an event that terminates the power of attorney or the authority of an attorney-in-fact is protected from liability as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4153.

(a) The authority of an attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney may be revoked as follows:

(1) In accordance with the terms of the power of attorney.

(2) Where the principal informs the attorney-in-fact orally or in writing that the attorney-in-fact’s authority is revoked or when and under what circumstances it is revoked. This paragraph is not subject to limitation in the power of attorney.

(3) Where the principal’s legal representative, with approval of the court as provided in Section 4206, informs the attorney-in-fact in writing that the attorney-in-fact’s authority is revoked or when and under what circumstances it is revoked. This paragraph is not subject to limitation in the power of attorney.

(b) An attorney-in-fact or third person who does not have notice of the revocation is protected from liability as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 300, Sec. 7.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4154.

(a) If after executing a power of attorney the principal’s marriage to the attorney-in-fact is dissolved or annulled, the principal’s designation of the former spouse as an attorney-in-fact is revoked.

(b) If the attorney-in-fact’s authority is revoked solely by subdivision (a), it is revived by the principal’s remarriage to the attorney-in-fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4155.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the authority of an attorney-in-fact under a nondurable power of attorney is terminated by the incapacity of the principal to contract.

(b) An attorney-in-fact or third person who does not have notice of the incapacity of the principal is protected from liability as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4300).

(c) This section is not subject to limitation in the power of attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 300, Sec. 8.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Attorneys-in-Fact [4200. - 4266.]



  ARTICLE 1. Qualifications and Authority of Attorneys-in-Fact [4200. - 4207.]

4200.

Only a person having the capacity to contract is qualified to act as an attorney-in-fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4201.

Designating an unqualified person as an attorney-in-fact does not affect the immunities of third persons nor relieve the unqualified person of any applicable duties to the principal or the principal’s successors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4202.

(a) A principal may designate more than one attorney-in-fact in one or more powers of attorney.

(b) Authority granted to two or more attorneys-in-fact is exercisable only by their unanimous action.

(c) If a vacancy occurs, the remaining attorneys-in-fact may exercise the authority conferred as if they are the only attorneys-in-fact.

(d) If an attorney-in-fact is unavailable because of absence, illness, or other temporary incapacity, the other attorneys-in-fact may exercise the authority under the power of attorney as if they are the only attorneys-in-fact, where necessary to accomplish the purposes of the power of attorney or to avoid irreparable injury to the principal’s interests.

(e) An attorney-in-fact is not liable for the actions of other attorneys-in-fact, unless the attorney-in-fact participates in, knowingly acquiesces in, or conceals a breach of fiduciary duty committed by another attorney-in-fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4203.

(a) A principal may designate one or more successor attorneys-in-fact to act if the authority of a predecessor attorney-in-fact terminates.

(b) The principal may grant authority to another person, designated by name, by office, or by function, including the initial and any successor attorneys-in-fact, to designate at any time one or more successor attorneys-in-fact.

(c) A successor attorney-in-fact is not liable for the actions of the predecessor attorney-in-fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4204.

An attorney-in-fact is entitled to reasonable compensation for services rendered to the principal as attorney-in-fact and to reimbursement for reasonable expenses incurred as a result of acting as attorney-in-fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4205.

(a) An attorney-in-fact may revocably delegate authority to perform mechanical acts to one or more persons qualified to exercise the authority delegated.

(b) The attorney-in-fact making a delegation remains responsible to the principal for the exercise or nonexercise of the delegated authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4206.

(a) If, following execution of a durable power of attorney, a court of the principal’s domicile appoints a conservator of the estate, guardian of the estate, or other fiduciary charged with the management of all of the principal’s property or all of the principal’s property except specified exclusions, the attorney-in-fact is accountable to the fiduciary as well as to the principal. Except as provided in subdivision (b), the fiduciary has the same power to revoke or amend the durable power of attorney that the principal would have had if not incapacitated, subject to any required court approval.

(b) If a conservator of the estate is appointed by a court of this state, the conservator can revoke or amend the durable power of attorney only if the court in which the conservatorship proceeding is pending has first made an order authorizing or requiring the fiduciary to modify or revoke the durable power of attorney and the modification or revocation is in accord with the order.

(c) This section is not subject to limitation in the power of attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4207.

(a) An attorney-in-fact may resign by any of the following means:

(1) If the principal is competent, by giving notice to the principal.

(2) If a conservator has been appointed, by giving notice to the conservator.

(3) On written agreement of a successor who is designated in the power of attorney or pursuant to the terms of the power of attorney to serve as attorney-in-fact.

(4) Pursuant to a court order.

(b) This section is not subject to limitation in the power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Duties of Attorneys-in-Fact [4230. - 4238.]

4230.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), a person who is designated as an attorney-in-fact has no duty to exercise the authority granted in the power of attorney and is not subject to the other duties of an attorney-in-fact, regardless of whether the principal has become incapacitated, is missing, or is otherwise unable to act.

(b) Acting for the principal in one or more transactions does not obligate an attorney-in-fact to act for the principal in a subsequent transaction, but the attorney-in-fact has a duty to complete a transaction that the attorney-in-fact has commenced.

(c) If an attorney-in-fact has expressly agreed in writing to act for the principal, the attorney-in-fact has a duty to act pursuant to the terms of the agreement. The agreement to act on behalf of the principal is enforceable against the attorney-in-fact as a fiduciary regardless of whether there is any consideration to support a contractual obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4231.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in dealing with property of the principal, an attorney-in-fact shall observe the standard of care that would be observed by a prudent person dealing with property of another and is not limited by any other statute restricting investments by fiduciaries.

(b) An attorney-in-fact who has special skills or expertise or was designated as an attorney-in-fact on the basis of representations of special skills or expertise shall observe the standard of care that would be observed by others with similar skills or expertise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 48, Sec. 1.   (SB 1038)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4231.5.

(a) If the attorney-in-fact breaches a duty pursuant to this division, the attorney-in-fact is chargeable with any of the following, as appropriate under the circumstances:

(1) Any loss or depreciation in value of the principal’s property resulting from the breach of duty, with interest.

(2) Any profit made by the attorney-in-fact through the breach of duty, with interest.

(3) Any profit that would have accrued to the principal if the loss of profit is the result of the breach of duty.

(b) If the
 attorney-in-fact has acted reasonably and in good faith under the circumstances as known to the attorney-in-fact, the court, in its discretion, may excuse the attorney-in-fact in whole or in part from liability under subdivision (a) if it would be equitable to do so.

(c) If a court finds that a person has in bad faith wrongfully taken, concealed, or disposed of property that belongs to a principal under a power of attorney, or has taken, concealed, or disposed of property that belongs to a principal under a power of attorney by the use of undue influence in bad faith or through
 the commission of elder or dependent adult financial abuse, as defined in Section 15610.30 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the person shall be liable for twice the value of the property recovered by an action to recover the property or for surcharge. In addition, except as otherwise required by law, including Section 15657.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the person may, in the court’s discretion, be liable for reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to the prevailing party. The remedies
 provided in this section shall be in addition to any other remedies available in law to the principal or any successor in interest of the principal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 99, Sec. 2.   (AB 381)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4232.

(a) An attorney-in-fact has a duty to act solely in the interest of the principal and to avoid conflicts of interest.
